Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-714
Meetings; notice; waiver.

Written or printed notice stating the place, day and hour of the meeting of members and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than three nor more than five days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the president or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling the meeting, to each member of record entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States mails in a sealed envelope addressed to the member at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage thereon prepaid. Notice of meetings of members may be waived in writing.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 14, p. 207;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-814;

R.S.1943, § 70-714.